Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6087.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 70.200.010 and 1997 c 40 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "Distributing organization" means a charitable nonprofit organization under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c) of the federal internal revenue code, or a public health agency acting on behalf of or in conjunction with a charitable nonprofit organization or a religious organization, which distributes children's items to needy persons free of charge and includes any nonprofit organization that distributes children's items free of charge to other nonprofit organizations or the public. A public health agency shall not otherwise be considered a distributing organization for purposes of this chapter when it is carrying out other functions and responsibilities under Title 70 RCW.(2) "Donor" means a person, corporation, association, religious organization, or other organization that donates children's items to a distributing organization or a person, corporation, association, religious organization, or other organization that repairs or updates such donated items to current standards. Donor also includes any person, corporation, association, religious organization, or other organization which donates any space in which storage or distribution of children's items takes place.(3) "Children's items" include, but are not limited to, clothes, diapers, food, baby formula, cribs, playpens, strollers, car seats, car seat restraints, toys, high chairs, and books.Sec. 2. RCW 70.200.020 and 1994 c 25 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Donors and distributing organizations are not liable for civil damages or criminal penalties resulting from the nature, age, condition, or packaging of the donated children's items unless a donor or distributing organization acts with gross negligence or intentional misconduct.(2) When accepting and distributing a car seat, a distributing organization must:(a) Inquire about the history of the car seat when accepting the car seat;(b) Include a disclosure on the car seat, stating that the organization is not aware of the history of the car seat and therefore cannot make any safety guarantees; and(c) Confirm that the car seat is not expired and is not subject to a safety recall, and not distribute or donate any car seat which is expired or subject to a safety recall.--- END ---